Utah statutes.
53A-22-105.   Remote industrial plant requiring new school building --
Construction permit requirements.
A state officer or local governmental official may not issue a construction
permit or other authorization for the construction of a remote industrial
plant requiring the provision of a new community, including new public
elementary and secondary school buildings, until the local school board of the
district in which the plant will be located has certified to the state office
or local official, in writing, that the district has obtained the funds, or a
firm commitment that funds will be made available as necessary, to build the
required minimal school facilities.
